Illinois, session 104th, SB408.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois School Student Records Act is 5amended by changing Sections 2 and 6 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 10/2)  (from Ch. 122, par. 50-2)7    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 102-466)8    Sec. 2. As used in this Act:9    (a) "Student" means any person enrolled or previously 10enrolled in a school.11    (b) "School" means any public preschool, day care center, 12kindergarten, nursery, elementary or secondary educational 13institution, vocational school, special educational facility 14or any other elementary or secondary educational agency or 15institution and any person, agency or institution which 16maintains school student records from more than one school, 17but does not include a private or non-public school.18    (c) "State Board" means the State Board of Education.19    (d) "School Student Record" means any writing or other 20recorded information concerning a student and by which a 21student may be individually identified, maintained by a school 22or at its direction or by an employee of a school, regardless 23of how or where the information is stored. The following shall   SB0408 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 06646 LNS 16682 b1not be deemed school student records under this Act: writings 2or other recorded information maintained by an employee of a 3school or other person at the direction of a school for his or 4her exclusive use; provided that all such writings and other 5recorded information are destroyed not later than the 6student's graduation or permanent withdrawal from the school; 7and provided further that no such records or recorded 8information may be released or disclosed to any person except 9a person designated by the school as a substitute unless they 10are first incorporated in a school student record and made 11subject to all of the provisions of this Act. School student 12records shall not include information maintained by law 13enforcement professionals working in the school.14    (e) "Student Permanent Record" means the minimum personal 15information necessary to a school in the education of the 16student and contained in a school student record. Such 17information may include the student's name, birth date, 18address, grades and grade level; , parents' or guardians' names 19and addresses; , attendance records; a summary of performance 20for students that received special education services; , and 21such other entries as the State Board may require or 22authorize. A summary of performance shall be substantially 23similar to the summary of performance form developed by the 24State Board. Any summary of performance maintained as part of 25a Student Permanent Record shall be kept confidential and not 26be disclosed except as authorized by paragraph (1) or (14) of   SB0408 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 06646 LNS 16682 b1subsection (a) of Section 6. A summary of performance may be 2excluded from a Student Permanent Record if, after being 3notified in writing that (i) school districts do not keep 4special education records beyond 5 years and (ii) if a summary 5of performance record is not kept in a student's permanent 6file, the student may not have the documentation necessary to 7qualify for State or federal benefits in the future, the 8student and parents or guardians consent in writing to the 9exclusion of a summary of performance. 10    (f) "Student Temporary Record" means all information 11contained in a school student record but not contained in the 12student permanent record. Such information may include family 13background information, intelligence test scores, aptitude 14test scores, psychological and personality test results, 15teacher evaluations, and other information of clear relevance 16to the education of the student, all subject to regulations of 17the State Board. The information shall include information 18provided under Section 8.6 of the Abused and Neglected Child 19Reporting Act and information contained in service logs 20maintained by a local education agency under subsection (d) of 21Section 14-8.02f of the School Code. In addition, the student 22temporary record shall include information regarding serious 23disciplinary infractions that resulted in expulsion, 24suspension, or the imposition of punishment or sanction. For 25purposes of this provision, serious disciplinary infractions 26means: infractions involving drugs, weapons, or bodily harm to   SB0408 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 06646 LNS 16682 b1another.2    (g) "Parent" means a person who is the natural parent of 3the student or other person who has the primary responsibility 4for the care and upbringing of the student. All rights and 5privileges accorded to a parent under this Act shall become 6exclusively those of the student upon his 18th birthday, 7graduation from secondary school, marriage or entry into 8military service, whichever occurs first. Such rights and 9privileges may also be exercised by the student at any time 10with respect to the student's permanent school record.11    (h) "Department" means the Department of Children and 12Family Services. 13(Source: P.A. 101-515, eff. 8-23-19; 102-199, eff. 7-1-22; 14102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22.) 15    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 102-466)16    Sec. 2. As used in this Act:17    (a) "Student" means any person enrolled or previously 18enrolled in a school.19    (b) "School" means any public preschool, day care center, 20kindergarten, nursery, elementary or secondary educational 21institution, vocational school, special educational facility 22or any other elementary or secondary educational agency or 23institution and any person, agency or institution which 24maintains school student records from more than one school, 25but does not include a private or non-public school.  SB0408 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 06646 LNS 16682 b1    (c) "State Board" means the State Board of Education.2    (d) "School Student Record" means any writing or other 3recorded information concerning a student and by which a 4student may be individually identified, maintained by a school 5or at its direction or by an employee of a school, regardless 6of how or where the information is stored. The following shall 7not be deemed school student records under this Act: writings 8or other recorded information maintained by an employee of a 9school or other person at the direction of a school for his or 10her exclusive use; provided that all such writings and other 11recorded information are destroyed not later than the 12student's graduation or permanent withdrawal from the school; 13and provided further that no such records or recorded 14information may be released or disclosed to any person except 15a person designated by the school as a substitute unless they 16are first incorporated in a school student record and made 17subject to all of the provisions of this Act. School student 18records shall not include information maintained by law 19enforcement professionals working in the school.20    (e) "Student Permanent Record" means the minimum personal 21information necessary to a school in the education of the 22student and contained in a school student record. Such 23information may include the student's name, birth date, 24address, grades and grade level; , parents' or guardians' names 25and addresses, attendance records; a summary of performance 26for students that received special education services; , and   SB0408 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 06646 LNS 16682 b1such other entries as the State Board may require or 2authorize. A summary of performance shall be substantially 3similar to the summary of performance form developed by the 4State Board. Any summary of performance maintained as part of 5a Student Permanent Record shall be kept confidential and not 6be disclosed except as authorized by paragraph (1) or (14) of 7subsection (a) of Section 6. A summary of performance may be 8excluded from a Student Permanent Record if, after being 9notified in writing that (i) school districts do not keep 10special education records beyond 5 years and (ii) if a summary 11of performance record is not kept in a student's permanent 12file, the student may not have the documentation necessary to 13qualify for State or federal benefits in the future, the 14student and parents or guardians consent in writing to the 15exclusion of a summary of performance. 16    (f) "Student Temporary Record" means all information 17contained in a school student record but not contained in the 18student permanent record. Such information may include family 19background information, intelligence test scores, aptitude 20test scores, psychological and personality test results, 21teacher evaluations, and other information of clear relevance 22to the education of the student, all subject to regulations of 23the State Board. The information shall include all of the 24following:25        (1) Information provided under Section 8.6 of the 26    Abused and Neglected Child Reporting Act and information   SB0408 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 06646 LNS 16682 b1    contained in service logs maintained by a local education 2    agency under subsection (d) of Section 14-8.02f of the 3    School Code. 4        (2) Information regarding serious disciplinary 5    infractions that resulted in expulsion, suspension, or the 6    imposition of punishment or sanction. For purposes of this 7    provision, serious disciplinary infractions means: 8    infractions involving drugs, weapons, or bodily harm to 9    another.10        (3) Information concerning a student's status and 11    related experiences as a parent, expectant parent, or 12    victim of domestic or sexual violence, as defined in 13    Article 26A of the School Code, including a statement of 14    the student or any other documentation, record, or 15    corroborating evidence and the fact that the student has 16    requested or obtained assistance, support, or services 17    related to that status. Enforcement of this paragraph (3) 18    shall follow the procedures provided in Section 26A-40 of 19    the School Code. 20    (g) "Parent" means a person who is the natural parent of 21the student or other person who has the primary responsibility 22for the care and upbringing of the student. All rights and 23privileges accorded to a parent under this Act shall become 24exclusively those of the student upon his 18th birthday, 25graduation from secondary school, marriage or entry into 26military service, whichever occurs first. Such rights and   SB0408 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 06646 LNS 16682 b1privileges may also be exercised by the student at any time 2with respect to the student's permanent school record.3    (h) "Department" means the Department of Children and 4Family Services. 5(Source: P.A. 101-515, eff. 8-23-19; 102-199, eff. 7-1-22; 6102-466, eff. 7-1-25; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 102-813, eff. 75-13-22.) 8    (105 ILCS 10/6)  (from Ch. 122, par. 50-6)9    Sec. 6. (a) No school student records or information 10contained therein may be released, transferred, disclosed or 11otherwise disseminated, except as follows:12        (1) to a parent or student or person specifically 13    designated as a representative by a parent, as provided in 14    paragraph (a) of Section 5;15        (2) to an employee or official of the school or school 16    district or State Board with current demonstrable 17    educational or administrative interest in the student, in 18    furtherance of such interest;19        (3) to the official records custodian of another 20    school within Illinois or an official with similar 21    responsibilities of a school outside Illinois, in which 22    the student has enrolled, or intends to enroll, upon the 23    request of such official or student;24        (4) to any person for the purpose of research, 25    statistical reporting, or planning, provided that such   SB0408 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 06646 LNS 16682 b1    research, statistical reporting, or planning is 2    permissible under and undertaken in accordance with the 3    federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act (20 4    U.S.C. 1232g);5        (5) pursuant to a court order, provided that the 6    parent shall be given prompt written notice upon receipt 7    of such order of the terms of the order, the nature and 8    substance of the information proposed to be released in 9    compliance with such order and an opportunity to inspect 10    and copy the school student records and to challenge their 11    contents pursuant to Section 7;12        (6) to any person as specifically required by State or 13    federal law;14        (6.5) to juvenile authorities when necessary for the 15    discharge of their official duties who request information 16    prior to adjudication of the student and who certify in 17    writing that the information will not be disclosed to any 18    other party except as provided under law or order of 19    court. For purposes of this Section "juvenile authorities" 20    means: (i) a judge of the circuit court and members of the 21    staff of the court designated by the judge; (ii) parties 22    to the proceedings under the Juvenile Court Act of 1987 23    and their attorneys; (iii) probation officers and court 24    appointed advocates for the juvenile authorized by the 25    judge hearing the case; (iv) any individual, public or 26    private agency having custody of the child pursuant to   SB0408 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 06646 LNS 16682 b1    court order; (v) any individual, public or private agency 2    providing education, medical or mental health service to 3    the child when the requested information is needed to 4    determine the appropriate service or treatment for the 5    minor; (vi) any potential placement provider when such 6    release is authorized by the court for the limited purpose 7    of determining the appropriateness of the potential 8    placement; (vii) law enforcement officers and prosecutors; 9    (viii) adult and juvenile prisoner review boards; (ix) 10    authorized military personnel; (x) individuals authorized 11    by court;12        (7) subject to regulations of the State Board, in 13    connection with an emergency, to appropriate persons if 14    the knowledge of such information is necessary to protect 15    the health or safety of the student or other persons;16        (8) to any person, with the prior specific dated 17    written consent of the parent designating the person to 18    whom the records may be released, provided that at the 19    time any such consent is requested or obtained, the parent 20    shall be advised in writing that he has the right to 21    inspect and copy such records in accordance with Section 22    5, to challenge their contents in accordance with Section 23    7 and to limit any such consent to designated records or 24    designated portions of the information contained therein;25        (9) to a governmental agency, or social service agency 26    contracted by a governmental agency, in furtherance of an   SB0408 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 06646 LNS 16682 b1    investigation of a student's school attendance pursuant to 2    the compulsory student attendance laws of this State, 3    provided that the records are released to the employee or 4    agent designated by the agency;5        (10) to those SHOCAP committee members who fall within 6    the meaning of "state and local officials and 7    authorities", as those terms are used within the meaning 8    of the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act, 9    for the purposes of identifying serious habitual juvenile 10    offenders and matching those offenders with community 11    resources pursuant to Section 5-145 of the Juvenile Court 12    Act of 1987, but only to the extent that the release, 13    transfer, disclosure, or dissemination is consistent with 14    the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act;15        (11) to the Department of Healthcare and Family 16    Services in furtherance of the requirements of Section 17    2-3.131, 3-14.29, 10-28, or 34-18.26 of the School Code or 18    Section 10 of the School Breakfast and Lunch Program Act;19        (12) to the State Board or another State government 20    agency or between or among State government agencies in 21    order to evaluate or audit federal and State programs or 22    perform research and planning, but only to the extent that 23    the release, transfer, disclosure, or dissemination is 24    consistent with the federal Family Educational Rights and 25    Privacy Act (20 U.S.C. 1232g);26        (12.5) if the student is in the legal custody of the   SB0408 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 06646 LNS 16682 b1    Department of Children and Family Services, to the 2    Department's Office of Education and Transition Services; 3    or 4        (13) under an intergovernmental agreement if an 5    elementary school district and a high school district have 6    attendance boundaries that overlap and are parties to an 7    intergovernmental agreement that allows the sharing of 8    student records and information between the districts. 9    However, the sharing of student information is allowed 10    under an intergovernmental agreement only if the 11    intergovernmental agreement meets all of the following 12    requirements:13            (A) The sharing of student information must be 14        voluntary and at the discretion of each school 15        district that is a party to the agreement.16            (B) The sharing of student information applies 17        only to students who have been enrolled in both 18        districts or would be enrolled in both districts based 19        on district attendance boundaries, and the student's 20        parent or guardian has expressed in writing that the 21        student intends to enroll or has enrolled in the high 22        school district.23            (C) The sharing of student information does not 24        exceed the scope of information that is shared among 25        schools in a unit school district. However, the terms 26        of an intergovernmental agreement may place further   SB0408 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 06646 LNS 16682 b1        limitations on the information that is allowed to be 2        shared; or .3        (14) to the Department of Human Services for the sole 4    purpose of assessing or evaluating the student's 5    eligibility for Medicaid waiver benefits consistent with 6    rules adopted by the Department of Human Services. 7    (b) No information may be released pursuant to 8subparagraph (3) or (6) of paragraph (a) of this Section 6 9unless the parent receives prior written notice of the nature 10and substance of the information proposed to be released, and 11an opportunity to inspect and copy such records in accordance 12with Section 5 and to challenge their contents in accordance 13with Section 7. Provided, however, that such notice shall be 14sufficient if published in a local newspaper of general 15circulation or other publication directed generally to the 16parents involved where the proposed release of information is 17pursuant to subparagraph (6) of paragraph (a) of this Section 186 and relates to more than 25 students.19    (c) A record of any release of information pursuant to 20this Section must be made and kept as a part of the school 21student record and subject to the access granted by Section 5. 22Such record of release shall be maintained for the life of the 23school student records and shall be available only to the 24parent and the official records custodian. Each record of 25release shall also include:26        (1) the nature and substance of the information   SB0408 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 06646 LNS 16682 b1    released;2        (2) the name and signature of the official records 3    custodian releasing such information;4        (3) the name of the person requesting such 5    information, the capacity in which such a request has been 6    made, and the purpose of such request;7        (4) the date of the release; and8        (5) a copy of any consent to such release.9    (d) Except for the student and his or her parents or, if 10applicable, the Department's Office of Education and 11Transition Services, no person to whom information is released 12pursuant to this Section and no person specifically designated 13as a representative by a parent may permit any other person to 14have access to such information without a prior consent of the 15parent obtained in accordance with the requirements of 16subparagraph (8) of paragraph (a) of this Section.17    (e) Nothing contained in this Act shall prohibit the 18publication of student directories which list student names, 19addresses and other identifying information and similar 20publications which comply with regulations issued by the State 21Board.22(Source: P.A. 102-199, eff. 7-1-22; 102-557, eff. 8-20-21; 23102-813, eff. 5-13-22.) 24    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 25changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text   SB0408 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 06646 LNS 16682 b1that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 2represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 3not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 4made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 5Public Act. 6    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 72026.